Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.03
Impounded operator's license; operation relating to employment authorized.

Any person whose operator's license is impounded pursuant to section 60-6,211.02 may be allowed by the court to operate a motor vehicle in order to drive to and from his or her place of employment.

Laws 1993, LB 564, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 21.